Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 26 Police Courts [Repealed]

26.010.
Criminal and penal jurisdiction of police courts. [Repealed.]

26.020.
Jurisdiction as an examining court. [Repealed.]

26.030.
Civil jurisdiction of police courts. [Repealed.]

26.035.
Procedure in civil cases in police courts. [Repealed.]

26.040.
Real estate cases, transfer of from police court in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.050.
Terms of police courts. [Repealed.]

26.060.
Place for holding police courts. [Repealed.]

26.070.
Orders, how modified, vacated or suspended in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.080.
Appeals to circuit court and Court of Appeals from police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.090.
Appeals to Court of Appeals from police court in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.100.
Appeals to circuit court from police court in cities of third class. [Repealed.]

26.110.
Appeals to circuit court and Court of Appeals from police court in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.120.
Appeals from police courts in cities of fifth and sixth classes. [Repealed.]

26.130.
Organization of police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.140.
Police judge in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.150.
Judge of police court in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.155.
Equation of compensation. [Repealed.]

26.160.
Riot, rout or unlawful assembly — Duty of police judge in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.170.
Police judge, third-class cities, salary, qualifications. [Repealed.]

26.180.
Powers of police judge in cities of third class — Fees. [Repealed.]

26.190.
Police court and judge in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.200.
Police judge in cities of fifth and sixth classes. [Repealed.]

26.210.
Compensation of police judge in cities of fifth and sixth classes. [Repealed.]

26.220.
Trial commissioners of police court in cities of first class — Judge pro tempore. [Repealed.]

26.230.
Police judge in cities of first class, how sworn off bench. [Repealed.]

26.235.
Trial commissioners of police court in cities of second class — Powers — Compensation. [Repealed.]

26.240.
Judge pro tem of police court in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.250.
Judge pro tem of police court. [Repealed.]

26.260.
Judge pro tem of police court in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.270.
Judge pro tem of police courts in cities of fifth and sixth classes. [Repealed.]

26.280.
Records of police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.290.
Courts of record — Seal — Certified copies of record. [Repealed.]

26.300.
Practice in police courts, how governed. [Repealed.]

26.310.
Procedure in examining court, cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.320.
Style of prosecutions and process. [Repealed.]

26.330.
Process, by whom issued. [Repealed.]

26.340.
Process in cities of first class, how directed and executed. [Repealed.]

26.350.
Process in cities of fourth class, to whom directed. [Repealed.]

26.360.
Trial of persons arrested in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.370.
Recognizances in police court in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.380.
Recognizances in police court in cities of third class. [Repealed.]

26.390.
Recognizances in police court in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.400.
Jury in police courts. [Repealed.]

26.405.
Police court jurors selection in second-class cities. [Repealed.]

26.407.
Police court jurors, third-class cities, selection — Compensation of jury commissioners. [Repealed.]

26.410.
Fees of witnesses in police courts, cities of first, second and fourth classes. [Repealed.]

26.420.
Witness fees, when taxed as costs in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.430.
Fees and costs in police courts. [Repealed.]

26.440.
Drunkenness or disorderly conduct — Disposition in cities of first and fourth classes. [Repealed.]

26.450.
Imprisonment for misdemeanor in city of first class. [Repealed.]

26.460.
Prisoners, where confined in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.470.
Imprisonment, how satisfied in cities of third class. [Repealed.]

26.480.
Fines and costs, how satisfied in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.490.
Prisoners, confinement and compulsory labor of, in cities of fifth and sixth classes. [Repealed.]

26.500.
Replevin bonds, recording and enforcement in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.510.
Final process, cities of third class. [Repealed.]

26.520.
Attachment upon return of execution in cities of second and fourth classes. [Repealed.]

26.530.
Fines, forfeitures, jail taxes and costs recovered in police courts, how disposed of. [Repealed.]

26.540.
Clerk and deputy clerks of police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.550.
Duties and powers of clerk in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.560.
Fees of clerk and deputy clerks, cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.570.
Clerk of police court in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

26.580.
Clerk of police court in cities of third class. [Repealed.]

26.590.
Clerk and deputy clerk of police court in cities of fourth class. [Repealed.]

26.600.
Policeman to serve in police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.610.
Matrons of police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.620.
Doorkeeper for police court in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

26.650.
Pensions for police court judges in cities of the second class. [Repealed.]

26.652.
Pensions for police court judges in cities of the third class. [Repealed.]

26.655.
Police judge pension fund — Contributions by judges — Control of fund. [Repealed.]

26.660.
Amount of pension. [Repealed.]

26.665.
Refund of contributions to defeated candidate for re-election as police judge. [Repealed.]

26.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]